Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The Task Force on Modernizing Grant Funding and Contracting is es-
tablished.
(2) The task force consists of 15 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint  one member from among members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one member  from among
members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Governor shall appoint 12 members as follows:
(A) One member who represents the office of the Governor;
(B) One member who represents the Oregon Department of Administrative Services;
(C) One member who represents a public  or private foundation with headquarters in this
state;  and
(D) Nine members who  represent nonprofit organizations that since January 1, 2020, have
received grants from or entered into public contracts with a state agency, a municipality or
another nonprofit organization.
(d) The Attorney General shall appoint one member who represents the Department of
Justice.
(3) The task force shall examine how the state’s granting and public procurement prac-
tices limit the wages of employees of nonprofit organizations and make recommendations  to
the Oregon Department of Administrative Services concerning:
(a) Changes to state procurement practices that will  support living wages for employees
of nonprofit organizations;
(b) Uniform application procedures for grant moneys that apply  to each of the following
agencies:
(A) The Department of Human Services;
(B) The Oregon Health Authority;
(C) The Housing and Community Services Department;
(D) The Department of Education;
(E) The Department of Early Learning and Care;
(F) The Oregon Youth Authority;
Enrolled Senate Bill 606 (SB 606-B) Page 1
(G) The Oregon Department of Emergency Management;
(H) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission; and
(I) The Department of Justice;
(c) Standard contracting language that permits flexibility in contract  terms and condi-
tions and multiyear contract terms;
(d) Sufficient reporting requirements that  are commensurate with funding levels and
that allow for adequate lead time for changes to reporting required within the term of  a
contract;
(e) Payment models that prioritize full cost recovery; and
(f) A mechanism for ongoing review and evaluation of grantmaking and  procurement
processes.
(4) The task force may conduct  studies, take testimony, request data and information
from state agencies and otherwise take  actions necessary to carry out the purposes set forth
in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action  by the task force requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an  appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call  of the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit  a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to an interim committee of  the Legislative
Assembly related to grantmaking and public procurement, with a copy to the Director of the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services, no later than September 15, 2024.
(12) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall provide  staff support to the
task force.
(13) Members  of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(14) Members of the task force who are not members of the  Legislative Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on  the task
force.
(15) All agencies of state government, as defined  in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance  of the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the
task force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on December 31, 2024.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (7), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5502), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds
received from  charges, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section
2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5502), collected or received  by the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for enterprise goods  and services, is in-
creased by $181,355.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 606 (SB 606-B) Page 2
Passed by Senate June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 22, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 606 (SB 606-B) Page 3